tools/nvda/louis/tables/en-ueb-g2.ctb
nofor word unperceive  136-1345-1234-12456-14-1236
nofor word unperceived  136-1345-1234-12456-14-1236-145
nofor word unperceiving  136-1345-1234-12456-14-1236-1245
nofor word unquick  136-1345-12345-13
nofor word unreceived  136-1345-1235-14-1236-145
nofor word unrejoice  136-1345-1235-245-14
nofor word unrejoiced  136-1345-1235-245-14-145
nofor word unrejoiceful  136-1345-1235-245-14-56-123
nofor word unrejoicefully  136-1345-1235-245-14-56-123-123-13456
nofor word unrejoicefulness  136-1345-1235-245-14-56-123-56-234
nofor word unrejoicer  136-1345-1235-245-14-1235
nofor word unrejoicing  136-1345-1235-245-14-1245
nofor word unrejoicingly  136-1345-1235-245-14-1245-123-13456
nofor word unrepaid  136-1345-1235-15-1234-145
nofor word unsaid  136-1345-234-145
nofor word walkabout  2456-1-123-13-1-12
nofor word wellpaid  2456-15-123-123-1234-145
nofor word westabout  2456-15-34-1-12
nofor word whereabout  5-156-1-12
nofor word whereafter  5-156-1-124
nofor word whereagain  5-156-1-1245
nofor word whereagainst  5-156-1-1245-34
nofor word whereinafter  5-156-35-1-124
nofor word whereinagain  5-156-35-1-1245
nofor word womanfriend  2456-135-134-1-1345-124-1235
nofor word womenfriends  2456-135-134-26-124-1235-234
nofor word would've  2456-145-3-1236-15
nofor word woulda  2456-145-1
nofor word wouldest  2456-145-15-34
nofor word wouldn't  2456-145-1345-3-2345
nofor word wouldn't've  2456-145-1345-3-2345-3-1236-15
nofor word wouldst  2456-145-34
